Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, a section shall be added to article I, to read: new text end new text begin Sec. 18. new text end new text begin Marriage is a fundamental right and shall not be restricted based on gender or race. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. If ratified, the amendment is effective January 1, 2027. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to state that marriage is a fundamental right and shall not be restricted based on gender or race? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end